Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB51.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 532.043 is amended to read as follows:
(1) In addition to the penalties authorized by law, any person convicted of, pleading
guilty to, or entering an Alford plea to a felony offense under KRS Chapter 510,
felony attempt to commit a felony offense under KRS Chapter 510, or KRS
529.100[ involving commercial sexual activity], 529.110, 530.020, 530.064(1)(a),
or 531.310 to 531.370[, or 531.320] shall be subject to a period of postincarceration
supervision following release from:
(a) Incarceration upon expiration of sentence; or
(b) Completion of parole.
(2) The period of postincarceration supervision shall be five (5) years.
(3) During the period of postincarceration supervision, the defendant shall:
(a) Be subject to all orders specified by the Department of Corrections; and
(b) Comply with all education, treatment, testing, or combination thereof required
by the Department of Corrections.
(4) Persons under postincarceration supervision pursuant to this section shall be subject
to the supervision of the Division of Probation and Parole and under the authority of
the Parole Board.
(5) If a person violates a provision specified in subsection (3) of this section, the
violation shall be reported in writing by the Division of Probation and Parole.
Notice of the violation shall be sent to the Parole Board to determine whether
probable cause exists to revoke the defendant's postincarceration supervision and
reincarcerate the defendant as set forth in KRS 532.060.
(6) The provisions of this section shall apply only to persons convicted, pleading guilty,
or entering an Alford plea after July 15, 1998.
Section 2. KRS 532.060 is amended to read as follows:
Page 1 of 3
XXXX 12/23/2024 12:21 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 9
(1) A sentence of imprisonment for a felony shall be an indeterminate sentence, the
maximum of which shall be fixed within the limits provided by subsection (2) of
this section, and subject to modification by the trial judge pursuant to KRS 532.070.
(2) Unless otherwise provided by law, the authorized maximum terms of imprisonment
for felonies are:
(a) For a Class A felony, not less than twenty (20) years nor more than fifty (50)
years, or life imprisonment;
(b) For a Class B felony, not less than ten (10) years nor more than twenty (20)
years;
(c) For a Class C felony, not less than five (5) years nor more than ten (10) years;
and
(d) For a Class D felony, not less than one (1) year nor more than five (5) years.
(3) For any felony specified in KRS Chapter 510, felony attempt to commit a felony
offense specified in KRS Chapter 510, or KRS 529.100, 529.110, 530.020,
530.064(1)(a), or 531.310 to 531.370[, 531.320, 531.335, or 531.340], the sentence
shall include an additional five (5) year period of postincarceration supervision
which shall be added to the maximum sentence rendered for the offense. During
this period of postincarceration supervision, if a defendant violates the provisions of
postincarceration supervision, the defendant may be reincarcerated for:
(a) The remaining period of his or her initial sentence, if any is remaining; and
(b) The entire period of postincarceration supervision, or if the initial sentence
has been served, for the remaining period of postincarceration supervision.
(4) In addition to the penalties provided in this section, for any person subject to a
period of postincarceration supervision pursuant to KRS 532.400 his or her
sentence shall include an additional one (1) year period of postincarceration
supervision following release from incarceration upon expiration of sentence if the
offender is not otherwise subject to another form of postincarceration supervision.
Page 2 of 3
XXXX 12/23/2024 12:21 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 9
During this period of postincarceration supervision, if an offender violates the
provisions of supervision, the offender may be reincarcerated for the remaining
period of his or her postincarceration supervision.
(5) The actual time of release within the maximum established by subsection (1) of this
section, or as modified pursuant to KRS 532.070, shall be determined under
procedures established elsewhere by law.
Page 3 of 3
XXXX 12/23/2024 12:21 PM Jacketed